Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.210

Advisory ballot for Alaskan Way viaduct improvements—Preferred alternative for Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall improvements.

(1) The most populous city, within the three-county region eligible to create a regional transportation investment district under this chapter, shall submit an advisory ballot to the city voters at the 2006 general election regarding voter preference of the tunnel and rebuild alternatives described in the environmental impact statement relative to the Alaskan Way viaduct project. The results of the election shall be advisory only and not binding regarding the final project to be constructed.

(2) In the alternative to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, following the report of the expert review panel's findings and recommendations completed under *RCW 47.01.400(4)(c), the city legislative authority shall hold public hearings on the findings and recommendations. After such time, and by November 1, 2006, the city legislative authority shall adopt by ordinance a preferred alternative for the Alaskan Way viaduct and Seattle Seawall replacement project. The preferred alternative must, at a minimum, be based on a substantial project mitigation plan and a comprehensive cost estimate review using the department's cost estimate validation process.

[ 2006 c 311 s 29.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 47.01.400 was repealed by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 39.

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.